Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-713
Burden of proof.

In a proceeding under sections 30-701 to 30-712, the burden of proof is upon the family member petitioner to establish his or her case by a preponderance of the evidence.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 13.